District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.69

Procurement training and assistance.

The Department shall:

(1)

Identify contracts that are suitable for certified business enterprises;

(2)

Assist certified business enterprises in identifying and preparing for business opportunities made available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, approved February 17, 2009 (Pub. L. No. 111-5; 123 Stat. 115), through informational presentations and the dissemination of information; and

(3)

Provide technical assistance regarding the District and federal procurement processes, including assisting certified business enterprises to comply with local and federal regulations and bonding requirements.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2369
as added May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-159, § 2(g), 57 DCR 3006